Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 2 Georgia Ports Authority
52-2-26.
Revenue bonds — Remedies of bondholders and trustee.

Any holder of revenue bonds issued under this chapter or any of the coupons appertaining thereto and the trustee under the trust indenture, if any, except to the extent the rights given in this chapter may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under the laws of this state, granted under this chapter, or granted under such resolution or trust indenture, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this chapter or by such resolution or trust indenture to be performed by the authority, or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of revenues and other charges for the use of the project or projects; but no holder of any such bond shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state to pay any such bond or the interest thereon or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the state. Any provision of this chapter or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any such bondholder or trustee shall have the right by appropriate legal or equitable proceedings (including, without being limited to, mandamus) to enforce compliance by the appropriate public officials with Article VII, Section IV of the Constitution of the State of Georgia and permission is given for the institution of any such proceedings to compel the payment of lease obligations.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 11; Ga. L. 1963, p. 342, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 67; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 52.

52-2-27.
Revenue bonds — Protection of rights of bondholders.

While any of the bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the authority or of its officers, employees, or agents shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interest and rights of the holders of such bonds; and no other entity, department, agency, or authority will be created which will compete with the authority to such an extent as to affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of the bonds nor will the state itself so compete with the authority. This chapter shall be for the benefit of the state, the authority, and the holders of any such bonds and, upon the issuance of bonds under this chapter, shall constitute a contract with the holders of the bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 17.

52-2-28.
Revenue bonds — Revenue refunding bonds.

The authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued under this chapter and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The issuance of such revenue refunding bonds, the maturities and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in respect to the same shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this chapter insofar as the same may be applicable.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 13.

52-2-29.
Revenue bonds — Status of bonds as legal investments and as securities for deposits.

The bonds authorized in this chapter are made securities in which:

All public officers and bodies of this state;

All municipalities and all municipal subdivisions;

All insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business;

All banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business;

All administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries; and

All other persons whatsoever who are authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state

may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them.

The bonds authorized in this chapter are also made securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of the bonds or other obligations of this state is authorized.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 14; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52.

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

52-2-30.
Revenue bonds — Confirmation and validation of bonds; venue of actions to confirm and validate bonds or to enforce rights under chapter.

Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure of Chapter 82 of Title 36, the “Revenue Bond Law.” Any such action and any action to protect or enforce any rights under this chapter and any suit or action against the authority shall be brought in the Superior Court of Chatham County, which shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of such actions; provided, however, that the venue of an action for a tort shall be brought in the county wherein committed if the authority has a facility located therein, otherwise Chatham County.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 16; Ga. L. 1963, p. 342, § 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 164, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 52/HB 1428.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that” for “provided, however,”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a comma was inserted following “provided” in the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 164, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor [approved March 18, 1986] or upon its becoming law without such approval and shall be applicable to any suit or action filed on or after such date. The provisions of this Act shall not affect any suit or action filed prior to the effective date of this Act in the Superior Court of Fulton County.”

52-2-31.
Power of authority to fix, revise, and collect charges; factors governing determination of amount of rentals and other charges; creation, use, and disposition of sinking fund; cancellation of purchased or redeemed bonds.

The authority is authorized to fix and to revise from time to time fees, rentals, and other charges for the use of each project and for the services and facilities furnished by the same and to charge and collect the same and to lease and to make contracts with any person, firm, or corporation with respect to the use of any project or part thereof. Such rentals and other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate thereof from the project or projects for which a single issue of revenue bonds is issued or from the authority or the terminal or facilities of which the project or projects are a part, so as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues of the project or projects, if any, to pay:

The cost of new construction of projects;

The cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the project or projects, including reserves for extraordinary repairs and insurance and other reserves required by the resolution or trust indenture, unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for; and

The principal of the revenue bonds and the interest thereon as the same shall become due.

The revenues and earnings derived from the projects for which a single issue of bonds is issued or from the authority or the terminal or facilities of which the project or projects are a part, except the part of such revenues and earnings as may be required to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the project or projects or the terminal or facilities of which the project or projects are a part, and to provide such reserves therefor as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in the resolution or the trust indenture in a sinking fund which is pledged to, and charged with the payment of:

The interest upon the revenue bonds as the interest falls due;

The principal of the bonds as the same falls due;

The necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal and interest; and

Any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase as hereinabove provided.

The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, but, except as may otherwise be provided in the resolution or trust indenture, the sinking fund shall be a fund for the benefit of all revenue bonds without distinction or priority of one over another. Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or the trust indenture, any moneys in such sinking fund in excess of an amount equal to one year’s interest on all revenue bonds then outstanding may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds. All revenue bonds so purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be canceled and shall not again be issued.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 10; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 7/HB 1060.

52-2-32.
Status of contracted-for rentals as obligations of state; payment of rentals; power of authority to enforce lessees’ duty to perform covenants and obligations; assignment of rentals due.

The rentals contracted to be paid by the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state to the authority under leases entered upon pursuant to this chapter shall constitute obligations of the state for the payment of which the good faith of the state is pledged. Such rentals shall be paid as provided in the lease contracts from funds appropriated for such purposes by the terms of the Constitution of Georgia. It shall be the duty of the state or any department, agency, or institution thereof to see to the punctual payment of all such rentals.

In the event of any failure or refusal on the part of lessees punctually to perform any covenant or obligation contained in any lease entered upon pursuant to this chapter, the authority may enforce performance by any legal or equitable process against lessees; and consent is given for the institution of any such action.

The authority shall be permitted to assign any rental due it by the lessees to a trustee or paying agent as may be required by the terms of any trust indenture entered into by the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 88, § 2.

52-2-33.
Duty of authority to prescribe rules and regulations for operation of projects; duty of authority to impose and collect rentals and other charges for use of facilities of projects.

It shall be the duty of the authority to prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of each project constructed under this chapter, including rules and regulations to ensure maximum use of each such project, and to impose rentals and other charges for the use of the facilities furnished by or related to the use of such project and to collect the same from all persons, firms, or corporations using the same.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 10; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 8/HB 1060.

52-2-34.
Acceptance of grants from federal agencies and of contributions of money and property from other sources.

The authority, in addition to the moneys which may be received from the sale of revenue bonds and from the collection of revenues and earnings derived under this chapter, shall have authority to accept from any federal agency grants for or in aid of the construction of any project or for the payment of bonds and to receive and accept contributions from any source of either money or property or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which such grants or contributions may be made.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 12.

52-2-35.
Requirement as to competitive bidding for contracts for new construction.

The authority shall have the right to do all new construction under an agency or construction management form of contract without the necessity of taking competitive bids.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 9.

52-2-36.
Status of moneys received under chapter as trust funds; provision by authority for payment of moneys to designated trustee; investment of moneys; sale of investments and reinvestment.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds, as grants or other contributions, or as revenues and earnings, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The authority shall, in the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the earnings and revenues to be received to any officer who or any agency, bank, or trust company which shall act as trustee of such funds and shall hold and apply the funds to the purposes of this chapter, subject to such regulations as this chapter and the resolution or trust indenture may provide.

Subject to such restriction as provided by resolution passed before the issuance of its bonds or by the trust indenture securing the bonds, the authority may invest any moneys received by it pursuant to authority of this chapter in obligations which are eligible as security for the investment of trust funds; and the authority may, by resolution, provide for the sale of any such investment and for the reinvestment of the proceeds thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 7; Ga. L. 1946, p. 60, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 9/HB 1060.

52-2-37.
Creation of authority and carrying out of authority’s corporate purpose as constituting a public purpose; covenant with bondholders as to tax-exempt status of authority’s property.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purpose is in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and is a public purpose and that the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this chapter; and this state covenants with the holders of the bonds that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the facilities erected, maintained, or acquired by it or any fees, rentals, or other charges for the use of such facilities or other income received by the authority and that the bonds of the authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within the state. The exemption from taxation provided for in this Code section shall include an exemption from sales and use tax on tangible personal property purchased by the authority for use exclusively by the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 15; Ga. L. 1970, p. 629, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 309, § 15/HB 219.

52-2-38.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 18.

52-2-39.
Supplemental nature of chapter.

This chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws; it shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 20.